District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-3803

Tax and license fee incentives.

Repealed.

Sept. 29, 1988, D.C. Law 7-173, § 4, 35 DCR 5758
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
October 4, 2000, D.C. Law 13-166, § 2(c), 47 DCR 5821
License law, supermarket developments, exemption conditions, see § 47-2827.
1981 Ed., § 47-3803.
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 7-173, the “Supermarket Tax Incentive Amendment Act of 1988”, see Mayor’s Order 89-84, April 24, 1989.